Utah statutes.
48-1d-301.   Partner agent of partnership.

Subject to the effect of a statement of partnership authority under Section 48-1d-303, the following rules apply:

(1)  Each partner is an agent of the partnership for the purpose of its activities and affairs.  An act of a partner, including the signing of an instrument in the partnership name, for apparently carrying on in the ordinary course the partnership's activities and affairs or activities and affairs of the kind carried on by the partnership binds the partnership, unless the partner did not have authority to act for the partnership in the particular matter and the person with which the partner was dealing knew, or had notice, that the partner lacked authority.

(2)  An act of a partner, which is not apparently for carrying on in the ordinary course the partnership's activities and affairs or activities and affairs of the kind carried on by the partnership, binds the partnership only if the act was actually authorized by all the other partners.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

